New York, session 2025-2026, A10873.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph 42 to read as follows: 3 (42) Every policy which provides medical, major medical or similar 4 comprehensive-type coverage and provides coverage for prescription drugs 5 shall include coverage for peripheral artery disease. 6 § 2. Subsection (l) of section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by 7 adding a new paragraph 24 to read as follows: 8 (24) Every group or blanket accident and health insurance policy 9 issued or issued for delivery in this state which provides medical, 10 major medical or similar comprehensive-type coverage and provides cover- 11 age for prescription drugs shall include coverage for peripheral artery 12 disease. 13 § 3. Section 4303 of the insurance law is amended by adding a new 14 subsection (yy) to read as follows: 15 (yy) A medical expense indemnity corporation or a health service 16 corporation which provides medical, major medical or similar comprehen- 17 sive-type coverage and provides coverage for prescription drugs shall 18 include coverage for peripheral artery disease. 19 § 4. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027 and shall apply to all 20 policies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered, or amended on 21 or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15354-01-6